South Carolina, session 2025-2026, H4067.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of South Carolina: Emergency departments SECTION 1.    Article 3, Chapter 7, Title 44 of the S.C. Code is amended by adding: Section 44-7-268.    As a condition of licensing and relicensing, every hospital in the State with an emergency department, regardless of classification, must have at least one physician physically present on site who is responsible for the emergency department at all times the emergency department is open. Time effective SECTION 2.    This act takes effect upon approval by the Governor. Ratified the 8th day of May, 2025. Approved the 12th day of May, 2025. __________